Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.020

"Tuition fees" defined—Use.

The term "tuition fees" as used in this chapter shall mean the fees charged students registering at the state's colleges and universities which consist of:

(1) The "building fees" as defined in RCW 28B.15.025; and

(2) The "operating fees" as defined in RCW 28B.15.031.

[ 1985 c 390 s 11; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 34; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.15.020. Prior: (i) 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 31, part. Formerly RCW 28.85.310, part. (ii) 1963 c 181 s 1, part; 1961 ex.s. c 10 s 1, part; 1959 c 186 s 1, part; 1947 c 243 s 1, part; 1945 c 187 s 1, part; 1933 c 169 s 1, part; 1931 c 48 s 1, part; 1921 c 139 s 1, part; 1919 c 63 s 1, part; 1915 c 66 s 2, part; RRS s 4546, part. Formerly RCW 28.77.030, part. (iii) 1963 c 180 s 1, part; 1961 ex.s. c 11 s 1, part; 1949 c 73 s 1, part; 1931 c 49 s 1, part; 1921 c 164 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4569, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.030, part. (iv) 1967 c 47 s 10, part; 1965 ex.s. c 147 s 1, part; 1963 c 143 s 1, part; 1961 ex.s. c 13 s 3, part. Formerly RCW 28.81.080, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.